New York, session 2025-2026, S6824.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The parks, recreation and historic preservation law is 2 amended by adding a new section 3.16 to read as follows: 3 § 3.16 Required sawyer training. 1. Beginning April first, two thou- 4 sand twenty-six, no person employed by the office shall: 5 (a) engage in tree maintenance, including but not limited to brushing, 6 bucking, limbing, and felling, without first obtaining a level A sawyer 7 certification through the United States forest service national crosscut 8 and chainsaw program; 9 (b) engage in tree maintenance in hazardous conditions without first 10 obtaining a level B sawyer certification through the United States 11 forest service national crosscut and chainsaw program; or 12 (c) provide instruction and training on tree maintenance without first 13 obtaining a level C sawyer certification through the United States 14 forest service national crosscut and chainsaw program. 15 2. All training mandated by this section shall be conducted during the 16 employee's regular working hours and employees shall receive compen- 17 sation at their regular rate of pay for any time spent participating in 18 such training. 19 3. For the purposes of this section, "hazardous conditions" shall mean 20 any situation that poses a significant risk to the health and safety of 21 personnel, including but not limited to natural disasters, extreme 22 weather, and other emergency situations. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10350-01-5